District of Columbia statutes.
1-623.41

Cost-of-living adjustment of compensation.

On or after April 1, 1990, the Mayor shall award cost-of-living increases in compensation for disability or death whenever a cost-of-living increase is awarded pursuant to §§ 1-611.05 and 1-611.06. The percentage amount and effective date of those increases shall be the same as for any increase granted under these sections. This section shall not apply to any collective bargaining agreements that are to the contrary.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2341, 25 DCR 5740
Mar. 15, 1990, D.C. Law 8-92, § 2, 37 DCR 778
Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-290, § 2(g), 52 DCR 1449
Dec. 15, 2015, D.C. Law 21-39, § 2(b), 62 DCR 13744
This section is referenced in § 1-623.33.
1981 Ed., § 1-624.41.
1973 Ed., § 1-353.41.
D.C. Law 15-290 rewrote the section which had read:
“On or after April 1, 1990, increases in compensation payable due to disability or death shall be in the same percentage amount and shall have the same effective date as any base salary increase granted, pursuant to §§ 1-611.05 and 1-611.06, to employees in the Career and Excepted Services not covered by collective bargaining. To be eligible for the increase, the disability or death of the employee must have occurred at least 1 year prior to the effective date of the increase.”
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-39 would have rewritten the section.
Applicability of D.C. Law 21-39: Section 3 of D.C. Law 21-39 provided (a) that the act shall apply upon the date of inclusions of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan; (b) that the Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council of the certification; and (c) that the Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in the District of Columbia Register and that the date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the applicability of the act.